South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4924.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-3-240. (A) There is created the General Assembly Member Salary Commission. (B)(1) The commission consists of seven appointees of the Governor, one from each of the seven United States Congressional Districts in this State. Members must have significant experience or expertise in law, economics, finance, human resources, personnel, business, or salary surveying, compensation, and benefits, along with other task-related abilities. (2) A member may not be an elected or appointed governmental official. (C) Beginning with Fiscal Year 2026-2027: (1) salaries for the members of the General Assembly must be based on recommendations by the General Assembly Member Salary Commission; and (2) the commission shall authorize a study be conducted every four years to recommend a salary range for the members of the General Assembly based on their job duties and responsibilities as well as the pay of legislative members in other states. (D) By December 15, 2026, the commission shall issue a report to the President of the Senate, Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee detailing its recommended salary range for members of the General Assembly. (E) Members of the committee shall receive mileage, subsistence, and per diem provided by law for members of state boards, commissions, and committees for each meeting attended. (F) Any increases in compensation of the members of the General Assembly must be done in accordance with Article III of the South Carolina Constitution. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----